District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Universal Free School Meals Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec 2. The Healthy Schools Act of 2010, effective July 27, 2010 (D.C. Law 18-
20; D.C. Official Code § 38-822.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 203b to read as
follows:
“Sec. 203b. Universal free school meals.
“(a) Beginning in School Year 2025-2026, and for every school year thereafter, public
schools, public charter schools, and private schools that participate in the National School Lunch


Program shall offer free breakfast, lunch, and after school snacks to all students, without
consideration of the student’s eligibility for a federally funded free or reduced-price meal.
“(b) The Office of the State Superintendent of Education (“OSSE”) shall reimburse
public schools, public charter schools, and participating private schools for meals provided to
students who are ineligible for a federally funded free or reduced-price meal.
“(c) OSSE shall ensure that all schools continue to receive federal reimbursements for
school meals for which they qualify, including the Community Eligibility Provision, the National
School Lunch Program, the National School Breakfast Program, and any available local
funding.
“(d) Reimbursements provided by OSSE shall not exceed the difference between the sum
of the amounts calculated for meals claimed based on the federal reimbursement rates for free
and reduced-price school meal and the full price of the meal provided to each student ineligible
for free and reduced-price meals.
“(e) OSSE shall provide training to school staff and administrators on how to implement
universal free school meals.
“(f) OSSE may issue rules to implement this section.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review


as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1).